Maryland, session 2026, HB0069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–403.
This subtitle does not apply to an individual [who]:
[(1) is employed in a capacity that the Commissioner defines, by regulation,
to be administrative, executive, or professional;]
(1) (I) WHO IS COMPENSATED ON A SALARY BASIS, AS DEFINED IN
29 C.F.R. § 541.602, OR A FEE BASIS, AS DEFINED IN 29 C.F.R. § 541.605, AT NOT
LESS THAN:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0069*

HOUSE BILL 69
1. A. FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JULY
1, 2027, $769.23 PER WEEK;
B. FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JULY 1,
2028, $826.92 PER WEEK;
C. FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JULY 1,
2029, $884.62 PER WEEK;
D. FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JULY 1,
2030, $942.31 PER WEEK; OR
E. BEGINNING JULY 1, 2031, $961.54 PER WEEK; OR
2. IF HIGHER, THE AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN 29 C.F.R.
§ 541.600; AND
(II) 1. WHOSE PRIMARY DUTY:
A. IS THE PERFORMANCE OF OFFICE OR NONMANUAL
WORK DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE MANAGEMENT OR GENERAL BUSINESS
OPERATIONS OF THE EMPLOYER OR THE EMPLOYER’S CUSTOMERS; AND
B. INCLUDES THE EXERCISE OF DISCRETION AND
INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT WITH RESPECT TO MATTERS OF SIGNIFICANCE;
2. A. WHOSE PRIMARY DUTY IS MANAGEMENT OF THE
ENTERPRISE IN WHICH THE EMPLOYEE IS EMPLOYED OR OF A CUSTOMARILY
RECOGNIZED DEPARTMENT OR SUBDIVISION OF THE ENTERPRISE;
B. WHO CUSTOMARILY AND REGULARLY DIRECTS THE
WORK OF TWO OR MORE OTHER EMPLOYEES; AND
C. WHO HAS THE AUTHORITY TO HIRE OR FIRE OTHER
EMPLOYEES OR WHOSE SUGGESTIONS AND RECOMMENDATIONS AS TO THE HIRING,
FIRING, ADVANCEMENT, PROMOTION, OR ANY OTHER CHANGE OF STATUS OF OTHER
EMPLOYEES ARE GIVEN PARTICULAR WEIGHT; OR
3. WHOSE PRIMARY DUTY IS THE PERFORMANCE OF
WORK REQUIRING:

HOUSE BILL 69 3
A. KNOWLEDGE OF AN ADVANCED TYPE IN A FIELD OF
SCIENCE OR LEARNING CUSTOMARILY ACQUIRED BY A PROLONGED COURSE OF
SPECIALIZED INTELLECTUAL INSTRUCTION; OR
B. INVENTION, IMAGINATION, ORIGINALITY, OR TALENT
IN A RECOGNIZED FIELD OF ARTISTIC OR CREATIVE ENDEAVOR;
(2) WHO is employed in a nonadministrative capacity at an organized
camp, including a resident or day camp;
(3) WHO is under the age of 16 years and is employed no more than 20
hours in a week;
(4) WHO is employed as an outside salesman;
(5) WHO is compensated on a commission basis;
(6) WHO is a child, parent, spouse, or other member of the immediate
family of the employer;
(7) WHO is employed in a drive–in theater;
(8) WHO is employed as part of the training in a special education program
for emotionally, mentally, or physically handicapped students under a public school system;
(9) WHO is employed by an employer who is engaged in canning, freezing,
packing, or first processing of perishable or seasonal fresh fruits, vegetables, or
horticultural commodities, poultry, or seafood;
(10) WHO engages in the activities of a charitable, educational, nonprofit, or
religious organization if:
(i) the service is provided gratuitously; and
(ii) there is, in fact, no employer–employee relationship;
(11) WHO is employed in a cafe, drive–in, drugstore, restaurant, tavern, or
other similar establishment that:
(i) sells food and drink for consumption on the premises; and
(ii) has an annual gross income of $400,000 or less;
(12) WHO is employed in agriculture if, during each quarter of the preceding
calendar year, the employer used no more than 500 agricultural–worker days;

HOUSE BILL 69
(13) WHO is engaged principally in the range production of livestock;
(14) WHO is employed as a hand–harvest laborer and is paid on a piece–rate
basis in an operation that, in the region of employment, has been and customarily and
generally is recognized as having been paid on that basis, if:
(i) the individual:
1. commutes daily from the permanent residence of the
individual to the farm where the individual is employed; and
2. during the preceding calendar year, was employed in
agriculture less than 13 weeks; or
(ii) the individual:
1. is under the age of 17;
2. is employed on the same farm as a parent of the individual
or a person standing in the place of the parent; and
3. is paid at the same rate that an employee who is at least
17 years old is paid on the same farm;
(15) WHO is a covered employee under the Secure Maryland Wage Act; or
(16) (i) WHO has entered into a contract to play baseball at the minor
league level; and
(ii) WHO is compensated in accordance with the terms of a collective
bargaining agreement that expressly states the wages and working conditions of
employees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.